North Carolina, session 2025, SB919.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education, the sum of
two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal
year to provide a directed grant to Smart Start of Forsyth County to expand early childhood
education and family support services.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S919-v-1*